Hawaii statutes.
§46-6 Parks and playgrounds for
subdivisions. (a) Except as hereinafter provided, each county shall adopt
ordinances to require a subdivider, as a condition to approval of a subdivision
to provide land in perpetuity or to dedicate land for park and playground
purposes, for the use of purchasers or occupants of lots or units in
subdivisions. The ordinances may prescribe the instances when land shall be
provided in perpetuity or dedicated, the area, location, grade, and other state
of the sites so required to be provided or dedicated. In addition thereto,
such ordinances may prescribe penalties or other remedies for violation of such
ordinances.

(b) In lieu of providing land in perpetuity or
dedicating land, the ordinances may permit a subdivider pursuant to terms and
conditions set forth therein to:

(1) Pay to the county a sum of money deemed adequate
by the county to purchase the park land the subdivider would otherwise have had
to provide or dedicate; or

(2) Combine the payment of money with land to be
provided or dedicated, the value of such combination to be as deemed adequate
by the county to purchase the total amount of land the subdivider would
otherwise have had to provide or dedicate.

The method of determining such full or partial
payment shall be prescribed by the ordinances. The ordinances shall also
provide that such money shall be used for the purpose of providing parks and
playgrounds for the use of purchasers or occupants of lots or units in the
subdivision. Each county may establish by ordinance a time limit within which
it must spend the park dedication fees it has collected.

(c) Pursuant to terms, conditions, and
limitations specified by the ordinances, a subdivider shall receive credit:

(1) For privately-owned and maintained parks and
playgrounds;

(2) For lands dedicated or provided for park and
playground purposes prior to the effective date of the ordinances.

(d) Upon the provision of land in perpetuity
or the dedication of land by the subdivider as may be required under this
section, the county concerned shall thereafter assume the cost of improvements
and their maintenance, and the subdivider shall accordingly be relieved from
such costs.

(e) The ordinances adopted pursuant to this
section may provide, where special circumstances, conditions, and needs within
the respective counties so warrant, for such exemptions and exclusions as the
councils of the respective counties may deem necessary or appropriate and may
also prescribe the extent to and the circumstances under which the requirements
therein shall or shall not be applicable to subdivisions.

(f) For purposes of this section certain terms
used herein shall be defined as follows:

(1) "Approval" means the final approval
granted to a proposed subdivision where the actual division of land into
smaller parcels is sought, provided that where construction of a building or
buildings is proposed without further subdividing an existing parcel of land,
the term "approval" shall refer to the issuance of the building permit.

(2) "Dwelling unit" means a room or rooms
connected together, constituting an independent housekeeping unit for a family
and containing a single kitchen.

(3) "Lodging unit" means a room or rooms
connected together, constituting an independent housekeeping unit for a family
which does not contain any kitchen.

(4) "Parks and playgrounds" mean areas used
for active or passive recreational pursuits.

(5) "Subdivider" means any person who
divides land as specified under the definition of subdivision or who constructs
a building or group of buildings containing or divided into three or more
dwelling units or lodging units.

(6) "Subdivision" means the division of
improved or unimproved land into two or more lots, parcels, sites, or other
divisions of land and for the purpose, whether immediate or future, of sale,
lease, rental, transfer of title to, or interest in, any or all such lots,
parcels, sites, or division of land. The term includes resubdivision, and when
appropriate to the context, shall relate to the land subdivided. The term also
includes a building or group of buildings, other than a hotel, containing or
divided into three or more dwelling units or lodging units.

(7) "Privately owned parks and playgrounds"
mean parks or playgrounds and their facilities which are not provided in
perpetuity or dedicated but which are owned and maintained by or on behalf of
the ultimate users of the subdivision pursuant to recorded restrictive
covenants. Where the privately owned park is a part of the lot or lots on which
a building or group of buildings containing or divided into three or more
dwelling units or lodging units is constructed, it shall not be required that
the private park or playground meet county subdivision standards nor shall the
area of the private park or playground be deducted from the area of the lot or
lots for purposes of zoning or building requirements. [L 1967, c 294, §1; HRS
§46-6; am L 1970, c 140, §1; am L 1977, c 208, §1; am L 1979, c 105, §5 and c
199, §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next